Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 8 Local Option
3-8-706. Financial report — Information.

In addition to the information required under §§7-9-407 —7-9-409, a financial report of a local-option ballot question committee, individual person, or elected official shall contain the following information:

(1)

The name, address, and telephone number of the local-option ballot question committee, individual person, or elected official filing the report;

(2)(A)

For a local-option ballot question committee as defined in §3-8-702(7)(A):

(i)

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report;

(ii)

The total amount of expenditures made by the local-option ballot question committee or on behalf of the local-option ballot question committee by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant during the period covered by the financial report;

(iii)

The cumulative amount of contributions and expenditures reported under subdivision (2)(A) of this section for each local-option ballot question committee;

(iv)

The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the financial report;

(v)

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report from persons who contributed less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the cumulative amount of that total for each local-option ballot question committee;

(vi)

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report from persons who contributed fifty dollars ($50.00) or more and the cumulative amount of that total for each local-option ballot question committee;

(vii)

The name and street address of each person who contributed fifty dollars ($50.00) or more during the period covered by the financial report, together with the amount contributed, the date of receipt, and the cumulative amount contributed by that person for each local-option ballot question committee;

(viii)

For each person listed under subdivision (2)(A) of this section, the contributor's principal place of business, employer, occupation, the amount contributed, the date the contribution was accepted by the local-option ballot question committee, and the cumulative amount contributed for each local-option ballot question;

(ix)

The name and address of each person who contributed a nonmoney item, together with a description of the item, the date of receipt, and the value, not including volunteer service by individuals;

(x)

A list of all expenditures by category, including without limitation the following:

(a)

Advertising;

(b)

Direct mail;

(c)

Office supplies;

(d)

Travel;

(e)

Expenses; and

(f)

Telephone; and

(xi)

The total amount of nonitemized expenditures made during the period covered by the financial report.

(B)

For a local-option ballot question committee as defined in §3-8-702(7)(B):

(i)

The total amount of contributions made by the committee to another ballot or legislative question committee reported during the period covered by the financial report; and

(ii)

The cumulative amount of contributions under subdivision (2)(B)(i) of this section.

(C)

For an individual person:

(i)

The total amount of expenditures made by the individual person or on behalf of the individual person by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant during the period covered by the financial report; and

(ii)

The cumulative amount of expenditures for each local-option ballot question.

(D)

For an elected official using public funds:

(i)

The total amount of expenditures made by the elected official using public funds or on behalf of the elected official using public funds by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant during the period covered by the financial report; and

(ii)

The cumulative amount of expenditures for each local-option ballot question; and

(3)

The name and street address of each person to whom expenditures totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more were made by the local-option ballot question committee, individual person, or elected official using public funds or on behalf of the local-option ballot question committee, individual person, or elected official using public funds by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant, together with the date and amount of each separate expenditure to each person during the period covered by the financial report and the purpose of each expenditure.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7; 2015, No. 226, § 4; 2017, No. 721, §§ 2-4.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted “individual person, or elected official” in the introductory language and in (1); redesignated former (2) as present (2)(A) and redesignated subdivisions accordingly; added (2)(B) and (C); and rewrote (3).

The 2017 amendment added “as defined in §3-8-702(7)(A)” at the end of (2)(A); repealed (2)(A)(x); and inserted (2)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

3-8-707. Financial reports — Verification.

The financial reports identified in §3-8-706 shall be verified by affidavit by the person filing them to the effect that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information disclosed is a complete, true, and accurate financial statement of contributions or expenditures.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-708. Financial reports — Time to file — Late fee.

(a)(1)

The first financial reports shall be filed no later than fifteen (15) days following the month in which the threshold of five hundred dollars ($500) under §3-8-706 is met and thereafter no later than fifteen (15) days after the end of each month until the election is held. However, for any month in which certain days of that month are included in a preelection financial report required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, no monthly report for that month shall be due, but those days of that month shall be carried forward and included in the final financial report.

(2)

Additionally, a preelection financial report shall be filed no less than seven (7) days prior to any election on the ballot question or legislative question, such statement to have a closing date of ten (10) days prior to the election.

(3)

Furthermore, a final financial report shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the election.

(b)

A local-option ballot question committee, individual person, or elected official who files a late financial report shall be subject to a late filing fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day the report remains unfiled.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7; 2015, No. 226, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted “or elected official” in (b).

3-8-709. Public inspection — Record retention.

(a)

All statements of organization and financial reports required by this subchapter shall be open to public inspection at the office of the Arkansas Ethics Commission during regular office hours.

(b)

All records supporting the reports filed under this subchapter shall be:

(1)

Made available to the commission; and

(2)

Retained by the filer for a period of four (4) years after the date of filing the report.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-710. Enforcement.

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall have the same power and authority to enforce the provisions of this subchapter as are provided the commission under §§7-6-217 and7-6-218 for the enforcement of campaign finance laws.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-711. Reporting the use of state funds to oppose or support ballot measure.

Any funds appropriated to any state agency, board, or commission that are expended for the purpose of opposing or supporting a local-option ballot question that is submitted or intended to be submitted to a popular vote at an election, whether or not it qualifies for the ballot, shall be reported to the Legislative Council if the amount exceeds one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7; 2017, No. 249, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted “as prescribed in §7-9-413” following “expended”.

3-8-712. Use of state funds to oppose or support a local-option ballot measure.

The use of state funds under this subchapter includes expenditures for:

(1)

Newspaper, television, radio, and other forms of communication;

(2)

Publication materials;

(3)

Travel expenses relative to reimbursement;

(4)

Surveys;

(5)

Private contracts; and

(6)

Postage.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-713. Applicability of §§ 3-8-711 and 3-8-712.

This subchapter does not apply to state funds appropriated to any elected officials.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-714. Scope.

Nothing in this subchapter may limit, waive, or abrogate the scope of any statutory or common law privilege, including, but not limited to, the work product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-715. Penalty.

Upon conviction, any person who knowingly fails to comply with this subchapter shall be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

Subchapter 8

— Circulation of Petition for Local Option Election

3-8-801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Canvasser” means a person who circulates a local option election petition or a part or parts of a local option election petition to obtain the signatures of petitioners thereto;

(2)

“Intoxicating liquor” means any beverage containing more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight;

(3)

“Paid canvasser” means a person who is paid or with whom there is an agreement to pay money or anything of value before or after a signature on a local option election petition is solicited in exchange for soliciting or obtaining a signature on a petition;

(4)

“Petition part” means a petition signature sheet containing the information required under this subchapter;

(5)

“Petitioner” means a person who signs a petition requesting a local option election;

(6)

“Registered voter” means a person who is registered at the time of signing the petition pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51; and

(7)

“Sponsor” means a person who arranges for the circulation of a local option election petition or who files a local option election petition with the official charged with verifying the signatures.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
8; 2015, No. 1251, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted present (2), (4), and (6); and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

3-8-802. Hiring and training of paid canvassers.

(a)(1)

A person shall not provide money or anything of value to another person for obtaining signatures on a local option election petition unless the person receiving the money or item of value meets the requirements of this section.

(2)

Before a signature is solicited by a paid canvasser, the sponsor shall:

(A)

Explain the Arkansas law applicable to obtaining signatures on a local option election petition to the canvasser; and

(B)(i)

Provide a complete list of all paid canvassers' names and current residential addresses to the county clerk.

(ii)

If additional paid canvassers agree to solicit signatures on behalf of a sponsor after the complete list is provided, the sponsor shall provide an updated list of all paid canvassers' names and current residential addresses to the county clerk.

(b)

Before obtaining a signature on a local option election petition as a paid canvasser, a person shall submit in person or by mail to the sponsor:

(1)

The full name and any assumed name of the person;

(2)

The current residence address of the person and the person's permanent domicile address if the person's permanent domicile address is different from the person's current residence address;

(3)

A signed statement taken under oath or solemn affirmation that states that the person has not pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a criminal offense involving a violation of the election laws, fraud, forgery, or identification theft in any state;

(4)

A signed statement that the person has read and understands the Arkansas law applicable to obtaining signatures on a local option election petition; and

(5)

A photograph of the person taken within ninety (90) days of the submission of the information required under this section.

(c)

A sponsor shall maintain the information required under this section for each paid canvasser for three (3) years after the general election.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
8; 2015, No. 1251, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment deleted former (a)(2)(A), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “county clerk” for “Secretary of State” in (a)(2)(B)(i) and (a)(2)(B)(ii); and deleted former (b)(5) and redesignated former (b)(6) as (b)(5).

3-8-803. Petition to determine granting of licenses for manufacture or sale or bartering, loaning, or giving away of intoxicating liquor.

(a)

An election to determine whether licenses will be granted for the manufacture or sale or the bartering, loaning, or giving away of intoxicating liquor shall be called by a petition signed by registered voters in the designated county, township, municipality, ward, or precinct in a number equal to thirty-eight percent (38%) of the registered voters.

(b)

The petition shall be filed with the county clerk.

(c)

The county clerk shall verify the signatures on the petition and determine the sufficiency of the petition no later than ten (10) days after the petition is submitted.

(d)

The total number of voters registered as certified by the county clerk to the Secretary of State by June 1 of each year pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, shall be the basis upon which the number of signatures of qualified electors on petitions shall be computed.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-804. Duties of election officers — Penalty for failure to perform.

(a)

The duties imposed by this subchapter upon members of the State Board of Election Commissioners, members of the county boards of election commissioners, election officials, and other officers expressly named in this subchapter shall be performed:

(1)

In good faith;

(2)

Within the time provided by this subchapter; and

(3)

In the manner provided by this subchapter.

(b)

If a member of a board, an election official, or another officer charged with a duty under this subchapter knowingly fails to perform that duty, he or she shall be upon conviction:

(1)

Fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

(2)

Removed from his or her office.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-805. Signing of petition — Penalty for falsification — Notice of suspected forgery.

(a)(1)

A person signing a petition under this subchapter shall:

(A)

Be a registered voter; and

(B)

Sign his or her own name and print his or her own name, address, birthdate, and the date of signing on a petition in his or her own handwriting.

(2)

If a person signing a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of this section requires assistance due to disability, another person:

(A)

May print the name, address, birthdate, and the date of signing; and

(B)

Shall sign and print his or her name in the margin of the petition.

(3)

A person who is under eighteen (18) years of age shall not act as a canvasser.

(b)

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person, acting as a canvasser, notary, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor knowingly:

(1)

Signs a name other than his or her own to a petition;

(2)

Prints a name, address, or birthdate other than his or her own on a petition unless the signer requires assistance due to disability and the person complies with this section;

(3)

Solicits or obtains a signature to a petition knowing that the person signing is not qualified to sign the petition;

(4)

Pays a person any form of compensation in exchange for signing a petition as a petitioner;

(5)

Accepts or pays money or anything of value for obtaining signatures on a petition when the person acting as a canvasser, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor knows that the person acting as canvasser's name or address is not included on the sponsor's list filed with the county clerk; or

(6)

As a sponsor, files a petition part with the official charged with verifying the signatures knowing that the petition part contains one (1) or more false or fraudulent signatures unless each false or fraudulent signature is clearly stricken by the sponsor before filing.

(c)

When the official charged with verifying the signatures has reasonable grounds to believe that one (1) or more signatures on a petition is forged, excluding signatures apparently signed by one spouse for another, the official shall report the suspected forgery and basis for suspecting forgery to:

(1)

The Department of Arkansas State Police, in the case of a statewide petition; or

(2)

The prosecuting attorney of the county, in the case of a local petition.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-806. Form of initiative petition — Sufficiency of signatures.

(a)

The petition for an ordinance, act, or amendment proposed by initiative shall be on substantially the following form:

“PETITION FOR LOCAL OPTION ELECTION

To the Honorable
,

County Clerk or City Clerk

We, the undersigned registered voters of the State of Arkansas, or
County, Arkansas, or City or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas, respectfully request that an election be held to determine whether licenses will be granted for the manufacture or sale or the bartering, loaning, or giving away of intoxicating liquor in the district described below, to the end that the same may be adopted, enacted, or rejected by the vote of the registered voters of said district. Each of us for himself or herself says:

I have personally signed this petition; I am a registered voter of
County, Arkansas, or City or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas, and my printed name, date of birth, residence, city or town of residence, and date of signing this petition are correctly written after my signature.

(Here insert a description of the district in which the election shall be held.)”

(b)

The information on the petition provided by the person may be used as evidence of the validity or invalidity of the signature. However, if a signature of a registered voter on the petition is sufficient to verify the voter's name, then it shall not be adjudged invalid for failure to sign the name or write the residence and city or town of residence exactly as it appears on voter registration records, for failure to print the name in the space provided, for failure to provide the correct date of birth, nor for failure to provide the correct date of signing the petition, all the information being an aid to verification rather than a mandatory requirement to perfect the validity of the signature.

(c)

No additional sheets of voter signatures shall be attached to any petition unless the sheets contain the full language of the petition.

(d)(1)

The signature section of the petition shall be formatted and shall contain the number of signature lines prescribed by the county clerk.

(2)

Before the circulation of a petition for signatures, the sponsor shall file a printed petition part with the county clerk in the exact form that will be used for obtaining signatures.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-807. Procedure for circulation of petition.

(a)(1)

Each petition under this subchapter for an election to be held in a district that includes more than one (1) county shall be prepared and circulated in a petition part, and each petition part shall be an exact copy of all other such petition parts upon which signatures of petitioners are to be solicited.

(2)

When a sufficient number of petition parts are signed by a requisite number of qualified electors and are filed and duly certified by the county clerk, they shall be treated and considered as one (1) petition.

(b)

Each petition part shall have attached to it the affidavit of the canvasser stating that:

(1)

The canvasser's current residence address appearing on the verification is correct;

(2)

All signatures appearing on the petition part were made in the presence of the affiant; and

(3)

To the best of the affiant's knowledge and belief each signature is genuine and each person signing is a registered voter.

(c)

No petition part under this section shall contain signatures of petitioners from more than one (1) county.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-808. Form of verification — Penalty for false statement.

(a)

Each petition containing signatures shall be verified in substantially the following form by the canvasser's affidavit thereon as a part thereof:

“State of Arkansas, County of

I,
(print name of canvasser)
, being duly sworn, state that each of the foregoing persons signed his or her own name to this sheet of the petition in my presence. To the best of my knowledge and belief, each signature is genuine and each signer is a registered voter of
County, or City or Incorporated Town of
. At all times during the circulation of this signature sheet, an exact copy of the popular name, ballot title, and text was attached to the signature sheet. My current residence address is correctly stated below.

Signature

Residence

Indicate one:
Paid Canvasser
Volunteer/Unpaid Canvasser

Subscribed and sworn to before me this
day of
, 20

Signature

Clerk, Notary, Judge, or Justice of the Peace

Seal
”.

(b)(1)

If the form under this section is substantially followed in a petition, it is sufficient.

(2)

The form shall not be held insufficient for clerical and merely technical errors.

(c)(1)

Petitions shall not be disqualified due to clerical or technical errors made by a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace when verifying the canvasser's signature.

(2)

Petitions shall not be disqualified for failure of a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace to sign exactly as his or her name appears on his or her seal if the signature of a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace is sufficient to verify his or her name.

(d)

A canvasser or paid canvasser who knowingly makes a false statement on a petition verification form required by this section shall be deemed guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-809. Failure to act on petition — Mandamus — Injunction.

(a)

If the county clerk does not examine and certify a petition under this chapter within the time prescribed in §3-8-803, the sponsors may apply to the circuit court with jurisdiction for appropriate relief.

(b)

If the court decides that the petition is legally sufficient, it shall order the county clerk to certify the sufficiency of the petition and set an election date.

(c)

On a proper showing that any petition is not sufficient, the court may enjoin the county clerk from:

(1)

Certifying its sufficiency; or

(2)

Setting an election date.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-810. Preservation of records.

(a)

All petitions, notices, certificates, or other documentary evidence of procedural steps taken under this subchapter shall be filed and preserved.

(b)

Petitions with signatures shall be retained for two (2) years after submission to the county clerk.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.

3-8-811. Count of signatures.

(a)

Upon the initial filing of a petition under this subchapter, the official charged with verifying the signatures shall:

(1)

Perform an initial count of the signatures; and

(2)

Determine whether the petition contains, on its face and before verification of the signatures of registered voters, the designated number of signatures required by the Arkansas Constitution and statutory law in order to call an election.

(b)

A petition part and all signatures appearing on the petition part shall not be counted for any purpose by the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial count of signatures, if one (1) or more of the following is true:

(1)

The petition is not an original petition, including without limitation a petition that is photocopied or is a facsimile transmission;

(2)

The petition lacks the signature, printed name, and residence address of the canvasser or is signed by more than one (1) canvasser;

(3)(A)

The canvasser is a paid canvasser whose name and the information required under §3-8-802 were not submitted by the sponsor to the county clerk before the petitioner signed the petition.

(B)

A canvasser is a paid canvasser if he or she is paid money or anything of value for soliciting signatures before or after the signatures are obtained;

(4)

The canvasser verification is not notarized, is notarized by more than one (1) notary, or lacks a notary signature or a notary seal;

(5)

The canvasser verification is dated earlier than the date on which a petitioner signed the petition;

(6)

The petition part clearly and unmistakably contains signatures of petitioners from more than one (1) county unless each signature of a petitioner from another county is clearly stricken before the filing of the petition with the county clerk; or

(7)

The petition part has a material defect that, on its face, renders the petition part invalid.

(c)

The following signatures shall not be counted for any purpose by the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial count of signatures:

(1)

A signature that is not an original signature;

(2)

A signature that is obviously not that of the purported petitioner;

(3)

A signature that is illegible and is accompanied by no personally identifying information;

(4)

A signature for which the corresponding printed name, address, or birthdate is written by someone other than the signer except under circumstances of disability of the signer; and

(5)

A signature that has any other material defect that, on its face, renders the signature invalid.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1251, § 5.